IVs.lexc
LEXICON Intransitive
@U.NOM.YES@ SetB ;
@U.COMP.YES@ SetC ;
@U.COMP.NO@ SetD ;
 IVclass ;

LEXICON IVclass 
@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.YES@ ActIVroots ;
@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.NO@ AffIVroots ;

LEXICON ActIVroots
mɨka Aspect ;

LEXICON AffIVroots
yana Aspect ;

LEXICON IVclassmarker
@U.ActIV.YES@-act:@U.ActIV.YES@-lha' # ;
@U.ActIV.NO@-aff:@U.ActIV.NO@-' # ;

! Verb and Noun head-marking

! LEXICON SetA
! ! @U.Pref.NO@-1sg.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-n' # ;
! ! @U.Pref.NO@-2sg.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-ka' # ;
! @U.Pref.NO@-3sg.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-y' # ;
! ! @U.Pref.NO@-1pl.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-k # ;
! ! @U.Pref.NO@-2pl.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-ka'% ay # ;
! ! @U.Pref.NO@-3pl.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-y'% ay% %(lhik%) # ;
! # ;

! LEXICON SetB ! possession for all verbal nouns and alienable nouns and tv incompletive
! ! @U.Pref.YES@1sg:@U.Pref.YES@ɨn- SetBFunction ;
! ! @U.Pref.YES@2sg:@U.Pref.YES@ka'- SetBFunction ;
! @U.Pref.YES@3sg:@U.Pref.YES@mu- SetBFunction ;
! ! @U.Pref.YES@1pl:@U.Pref.YES@muk- SetBFunction ;
! ! @U.Pref.YES@2pl:@U.Pref.YES@ka(ay)- SetBFunction ;
! ! @U.Pref.YES@3pl:@U.Pref.YES@mu(ay)- SetBFunction ;

! LEXICON SetBFunction
! @U.NOM.NO@.subj-:@U.NOM.NO@ TVstems ; ! TV incompletive
! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 TVstems ; !TV Verbal nouns
! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 IVclass ; ! IV Verbal nouns
! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 ANsubclasses ; ! Alienable nouns
! @U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@0 VNstems ; ! Variable nouns

! LEXICON SetC !IV completive aspect
! ! @U.NOM.NO@1sg.comp-:@U.NOM.NO@ɨn- IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@2sg.comp-:@U.NOM.NO@ka- IVclass ;
! @U.NOM.NO@3sg.comp-:@U.NOM.NO@%0- IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@1pl.comp-:@U.NOM.NO@muk- IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@2pl.comp-:@U.NOM.NO@ka(ay) IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@3pl.comp-:@U.NOM.NO@%0(ay)- IVclass ;

! LEXICON SetD !IV incompletive aspect
! ! @U.NOM.NO@1sg.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@ɨn- IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@2sg.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@ka- IVclass ;
! @U.NOM.NO@3sg.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@a- IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@1pl.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@muk- IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@2pl.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@ka(ay) IVclass ;
! ! @U.NOM.NO@3pl.incomp-:@U.NOM.NO@a(ay)- IVclass ;

! LEXICON SetE !Possession for inalienable nouns
! @U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-1sg.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-n' # ;
! @U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-2sg.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka' # ;
! @U.ADJ.YES@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3sg.poss:@U.ADJ.YES@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h # ;
! @U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-1pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-k # ;
! @U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-2pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka% ay # ;
! @U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h% lhik # ;
! # ;
